Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 16 O.S. 2021, Section 93, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 93. Every deed or other instrument affecting real
estate made by a corporation must have the name of such corporation
subscribed thereto either by an attorney-in-fact, chief executive
officer, chief financial officer, president, vice-president,
chairman or vice-chairman of the board of directors of such
corporation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12202 JL 01/15/25

Req. No. 12202 Page 1